Washington statutes.
RCW 43.158.030

Clean energy projects of statewide significance—Department of commerce.

(1)(a) The department of commerce, in consultation with natural resources agencies and other state agencies identified as likely to have a role in siting or permitting a project, must review applications received under RCW 43.158.020. Within 14 business days of receiving the application, the department of commerce must mail or provide in person a written determination that the application is complete, or if the application is incomplete, an opportunity to meet with the department of commerce to determine what is necessary to make the application complete. Within seven business days after an applicant has submitted additional information identified by the department of commerce as being necessary for a complete application, the department of commerce must notify the applicant whether the application is complete or what additional information is necessary.

(b) When the application is complete, the director of the department of commerce must determine within 60 business days whether to designate an applicant's project as a clean energy project of statewide significance.

(c) A determination of completeness does not preclude the department of commerce from requesting additional information if new information is required or substantial changes in the proposed project occur.

(2) The department of commerce may designate a clean energy project of statewide significance taking into consideration:

(a) Whether the project qualifies as a clean energy project;

(b) Whether the project will: Contribute to achieving state emission reduction limits under chapter 70A.45 RCW; be consistent with the state energy strategy adopted by the department of commerce; contribute to achieving other state requirements for clean energy and greenhouse gas emissions reductions; and support the state's economic development goals;

(c) Whether the level of applicant need for coordinated state assistance, including for siting and permitting and the complexity of the project, warrants the designation of a project;

(d) Whether the project is proposed for an area or for a clean energy technology that has been reviewed through a nonproject environmental review process, or least-conflict siting process including, but not limited to, the processes identified in RCW 43.21C.538 and section 306, chapter 230, Laws of 2023, and whether the project is consistent with the recommendations of such processes;

(e) Whether the project is anticipated to have potential near-term or long-term significant positive or adverse impacts on environmental and public health, including impacts to:

(i) State or federal endangered species act listed species in Washington;

(ii) Overburdened communities; and

(iii) Rights, interests, and resources, including tribal cultural resources, of potentially affected federally recognized Indian tribes; and

(f) Input received from potentially affected federally recognized Indian tribes, which the department must solicit and acknowledge the receipt of.

(3) In determining whether to approve an application, the department of commerce must consider information contained in an application under RCW 43.158.020 demonstrating an applicant's tribal outreach and engagement, engagement with the department of archaeology and historic preservation, and engagement with the governor's office of Indian affairs.

(4)(a) The department of commerce may designate an unlimited number of projects of statewide significance that meet the criteria of this section.

(b) An applicant whose application to the department of commerce under this chapter is not successful is eligible to reapply.

[ 2023 c 230 s 203.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 230: See note following RCW 43.394.010.